
































HighTower Advisors LLC Has $742,000 Position in National Fuel Gas Company (NFG) - Markets Daily













































 
























 




 





















Daily Ratings & News for National Fuel Gas Company
        	Complete the form below to receive the latest headlines and analysts' recommendationsfor National Fuel Gas Company with our free daily email newsletter:



 





Follow @TheMarketsDaily


The Markets Daily









Recent Posts

Meeder Asset Management Inc. Reduces Position in International Game Technology (NYSE:IGT)
Meeder Asset Management Inc. Has $532,000 Position in Tupperware Brands Corporation (NYSE:TUP)
Meeder Asset Management Inc. Has $551,000 Position in Oil States International, Inc. (NYSE:OIS)
Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc. Purchases 572 Shares of Fortune Brands Home & Security, Inc. (FBHS)
Lennar Corporation (NYSE:LEN) Shares Sold by Chevy Chase Trust Holdings Inc.
Walt Disney Company (The) (DIS) Stake Held by Capital Insight Partners LLC
Conning Inc. Acquires 40,113 Shares of Merck & Company, Inc. (MRK)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Buys 40 Shares of American Financial Group, Inc. (NYSE:AFG)
State of Alaska Department of Revenue Acquires 3,030 Shares of Raymond James Financial, Inc. (NYSE:RJF)
Livforsakringsbolaget Skandia Omsesidigt Holds Stake in Torchmark Corporation (NYSE:TMK)
ILG Inc. (NASDAQ:ILG) Stake Boosted by State of Alaska Department of Revenue
ProAssurance Corporation (NYSE:PRA) Stake Increased by State of Alaska Department of Revenue
AQR Capital Management LLC Decreases Position in Baxter International Inc. (BAX)
Valero Energy Corporation (VLO) Stake Increased by Gotham Asset Management LLC
AutoZone, Inc. (NYSE:AZO) Stock Rating Lowered by Wolfe Research
Deutsche Bank AG Reiterates “Buy” Rating for AptarGroup, Inc. (NYSE:ATR)
Chipotle Mexican Grill, Inc. (CMG) Earns “Hold” Rating from Canaccord Genuity
Zacks Investment Research Upgrades Arrow Electronics, Inc. (ARW) to Buy
NIC Inc. (EGOV) Price Target Cut to $16.00
Capital Investment Advisors LLC Has $344,000 Stake in Delta Air Lines, Inc. (NYSE:DAL)




 


HighTower Advisors LLC Has $742,000 Position in National Fuel Gas Company (NFG)

					Posted by Sarita Garza on Jul 21st, 2017 // No Comments 




HighTower Advisors LLC boosted its stake in  National Fuel Gas Company (NYSE:NFG) by 5.3% during the first quarter, according to its most recent Form 13F filing with the SEC. The institutional investor  owned 12,401 shares of the oil and gas producer’s stock after buying an additional 625 shares during the period. HighTower Advisors LLC’s holdings in National Fuel Gas were worth $742,000 at the end of the most recent quarter. 
Other hedge funds have also recently made changes to their positions in the company. Fifth Third Bancorp boosted its stake in shares of  National Fuel Gas by 87.3% in the first quarter. Fifth Third Bancorp now owns 2,841 shares of the oil and gas producer’s stock worth $169,000 after buying an additional 1,324 shares during the period.  Karpas Strategies LLC acquired a new stake in  National Fuel Gas during the first quarter worth about $203,000.  Pennsylvania Trust Co acquired a new stake in  National Fuel Gas during the first quarter worth about $205,000.  IFC Holdings Incorporated FL acquired a new stake in  National Fuel Gas during the first quarter worth about $205,000.  Finally, Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC acquired a new stake in  National Fuel Gas during the first quarter worth about $209,000. 68.93% of the stock is owned by hedge funds and other institutional investors. 


 Get National Fuel Gas Company alerts:



Shares of National Fuel Gas Company (NYSE NFG) traded up 0.52% during mid-day trading on Friday, hitting $58.51. The stock had a trading volume of 46,406 shares. National Fuel Gas Company has a 12 month low of $50.61 and a 12 month high of $61.25. The firm has a 50 day moving average price of $56.63 and a 200-day moving average price of $57.47. The stock has a market cap of $5.00 billion, a P/E ratio of 22.40 and a beta of 0.97. 




National Fuel Gas (NYSE:NFG) last released its quarterly earnings data on Thursday, May 4th. The oil and gas producer reported $1.04 earnings per share for the quarter, missing the consensus estimate of $1.05 by $0.01. National Fuel Gas had a return on equity of 18.67% and a net margin of 14.24%. The business had revenue of $522.10 million during the quarter, compared to analysts’ expectations of $514.43 million. During the same quarter last year, the business posted $0.97 EPS. The company’s quarterly revenue was up 16.3% compared to the same quarter last year.  On average, equities research analysts forecast that  National Fuel Gas Company will post $3.26 EPS for the current year. 
The business also recently disclosed a quarterly dividend, which was paid on Friday, July 14th. Investors of record on Friday, June 30th were given a dividend of $0.415 per share. This represents a $1.66 dividend on an annualized basis and a yield of 2.85%. The ex-dividend date of this dividend  was Wednesday, June 28th. This is a positive change from National Fuel Gas’s previous quarterly dividend of $0.41. National Fuel Gas’s dividend payout ratio (DPR) is 63.36%. 
WARNING: “HighTower Advisors LLC Has $742,000 Position in National Fuel Gas Company (NFG)” was first  published by Markets Daily and is the sole property of of Markets Daily. If you are reading this piece of content on another site, it was illegally copied and reposted in violation of US & international trademark and copyright legislation. The correct version of this piece of content can be read at https://www.themarketsdaily.com/2017/07/21/hightower-advisors-llc-purchases-625-shares-of-national-fuel-gas-company-nfg-updated.html. 
NFG has been the subject of a number of recent research reports. Scotiabank  set a $58.00 price target on National Fuel Gas and gave the stock a “hold” rating in a research report on Saturday, July 1st. Jefferies Group LLC  reaffirmed a “hold” rating and set a $52.00 price target on shares of National Fuel Gas in a research report on Friday, July 14th. BidaskClub raised National Fuel Gas from a “sell” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Tuesday, June 13th. ValuEngine downgraded National Fuel Gas from a “buy” rating to a “hold” rating in a research report on Friday, June 2nd. Finally, TheStreet raised National Fuel Gas from a “c+” rating to a “b” rating in a report on Friday, June 16th. Six investment analysts have rated the stock with a hold rating and one  has issued  a buy rating to the company. National Fuel Gas currently has an average rating of “Hold” and an average price target of $59.00.
National Fuel Gas Company Profile
National Fuel Gas Company is a holding company. The Company is an energy company engaged principally in the production, gathering, transportation, distribution and marketing of natural gas. The Company operates in five business segments: Exploration and Production, Pipeline and Storage, Gathering, Utility, and Energy Marketing.







Receive News & Ratings for National Fuel Gas Company Daily - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings for National Fuel Gas Company and related companies with MarketBeat.com's FREE daily email newsletter.



 





























Latest News






Leave a Reply

Click here to cancel reply.




Name  (Required) 



Mail (will not be published)  (Required) 



Website






























































Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC Sells 1781 Shares of Nike, Inc. (NKE)





















































































 





 

 

 

 







 

 

 

 







 

 

 

 


 


 







15Jul

Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC Sells 1781 Shares of Nike, Inc. (NKE)Cassandra Hanson





According to the past 5 years report, the company on average reported 2.80% year-over-year EPS growth and sales growth was recorded at 0.50%. The company has market cap of $40.11 million. Board Of Trustees Of The Leland Stanford Junior University invested in 715,385 shares or 4.3% of the stock. About 201,587 shares traded. Descartes Systems Group Inc (USA) (NASDAQ:DSGX) has risen 29.29% since July 14, 2016 and is uptrending. It has underperformed by 16.70% the S&P500. Columbia Wanger Asset Limited Co has invested 0.76% in Tenneco Inc (NYSE:TEN). The company has market cap of $95.98 billion. (NKE) by 1107.83% based on its latest 2016Q4 regulatory filing with the SEC. The New York-based Hs Management Partners Llc has invested 5.98% in the stock. During the same quarter past year, the firm posted $0.49 EPS.Here is the rundown on market activity for Nike, Inc. Accredited Investors Inc. now owns 4,167 shares of the footwear maker's stock worth $232,000 after buying an additional 19 shares during the period. It's now trading about -3.96% below its 52-week high. Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE) has declined 9.24% since July 13, 2016 and is downtrending. It has underperformed by 25.94% the S&P500. Its up 2.70, from 1.8 in 2016Q3. 4 funds opened positions while 5 raised stakes. Pacific Glob Investment Mgmt holds 0.28% or 26,676 shares. Howard Capital Mngmt holds 252,469 shares. Northwestern Mutual Wealth Mngmt owns 5,081 shares. Boys Arnold And Co Inc invested 0.18% of its portfolio in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). Moreover, Wendell David Assoc has 2.66% invested in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). Gamco Invsts Inc Et Al accumulated 0.01% or 20,580 shares. Washington Trust Retail Bank owns 880 shares for 0.01% of their portfolio. Bartlett And Lc has invested 0.59% of its portfolio in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). 1,175 are held by Acadian Asset Limited Company. Driehaus Capital Mgmt Ltd Liability Corp reported 47,882 shares. Philadelphia Tru owns 298,571 shares for 1.16% of their portfolio. It also reduced its holding in Novartis Adr (NYSE:NVS) by 275,200 shares in the quarter, leaving it with 684,294 shares, and cut its stake in Intuit (NASDAQ:INTU).Total cash per share on the most recent quarter is 3.75. (NYSE:CRM) news was published by Seekingalpha.com which published an article titled: "Salesforce announces three new AI tools for Einstein platform" on June 28, 2017.Accredited Investors Inc. raised its stake in Nike by 0.5% in the first quarter. Its down 0.08, from 1.75 in 2016Q3.A number of hedge funds and other institutional investors have recently bought and sold shares of NKE. 23 funds opened positions while 46 raised stakes.The total number of shares percentage held by insiders is about 0.2% while the number of Shares % held by institutions is 83.9%. Peregrine Asset Advisers, a Oregon-based fund reported 33,906 shares. Lansdowne Partners (Uk) Llp owns 17.05 million shares or 7.72% of their United States portfolio. Foundry Prns Limited Liability invested in 51,994 shares. Pacad Inv reported 78,295 shares.
Urban Outfitters, Inc. (URBN), Comstock Mining Inc. (LODE) — Stocks Trend Overview
					The market capitalization for the company is reported at $8.48 billion, while the P/E ratio yielded by the company was 79.13. The rating scale runs from 1 to 5 with 5 indicating a Strong Sell, 1 indicating a Strong Buy and 3 indicating a Hold.
				Shares of Nike (NKE) traded down 0.69% during midday trading on Thursday, hitting $57.16. Financial Advisory Gru stated it has 6,687 shares or 0.13% of all its holdings. Geode Cap Ltd accumulated 777,661 shares. It increased, as 23 investors sold Tenneco Inc shares while 93 reduced holdings. Twin Capital Incorporated accumulated 102,280 shares. Headinvest Ltd Liability reported 0.12% in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE).NKE has been the topic of several research reports. The firm had revenue of $8.68 billion for the quarter, compared to analysts' expectations of $8.63 billion.TRADEMARK VIOLATION NOTICE: "C WorldWide Group Holding A S Has $11.01 Million Stake in Nike, Inc". Two research analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, seventeen have given a hold rating and nineteen have assigned a buy rating to the stock. Therefore 59% are positive. As per Wednesday, June 29, the company rating was maintained by DA Davidson. The ex-dividend date of this dividend was Thursday, June 1st. The firm has "Sell" rating by Jefferies given on Thursday, August 27. As per Tuesday, March 21, the company rating was downgraded by Morgan Stanley. Vetr upgraded shares of Nike from a "sell" rating to a "hold" rating and set a $57.35 price target for the company in a research note on Tuesday, July 4th. The firm earned "Buy" rating on Friday, October 16 by Argus Research. Nomura reaffirmed a "buy" rating and set a $60.00 price objective on shares of Nike in a research report on Friday, June 30th. (NYSE:NKE). Trevor A. Edwards, President, NIKE Brand disclosed the sale of 200,000 shares of NKE stock.Since January 1, 0001, it had 1 insider buy, and 7 selling transactions for $30.70 million activity. ROGERS JOHN W JR had bought 3,000 shares worth $100,710 on Thursday, May 11. PARKER MARK G also sold $5.55 million worth of Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE) on Monday, April 3. It also upped Suntrust Banks (NYSE:STI) stake by 49,460 shares and now owns 417,021 shares.Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our daily email newsletter.



Related news:


How Analysts Rated JD Wetherspoon plc (LON:JDW) Last Week?


Another cross desecrated in Goa, cops up security


Samsung Galaxy Note 8 Render Pictures Leaked Out With Front Side


Ares Capital Corp Q4 2016 Institutional Investor Sentiment Better Than Expected


SC gives one week to Centre to decide on NRI voting rights


Swiss National Bank Has $1.37 Million Position in Cohen & Steers Inc (CNS)


Nicholas Company Inc. Maintains Stake in Red Hat, Inc. (RHT)


Wimbledon 2017 order of play, day 12 - women's final


Amarnath terror attack: Police arrest PDP MLA's driver


Wilshere will have to work hard for a place at Arsenal - Wenger


YouTube finally ads thumbnail previews for videos


Philippine Ex-President Faces Charges Over Botched Raid


RMB Capital Management LLC Purchases New Stake in Shire PLC (SHPG)


Share this:












 










Hot News 






Untitled Suburban Fantasy Pixar Movie Announced!

Jul 15, 2017 - 14:45 


His trick? He can multiply. "When I first saw " Toy Story , ' I was amazed by the groundbreaking computer-generated animation". The presentation ended with an elaborate musical number with music from Coco , with Gonzalez and Bratt participated.





Melania Trump honors France with floral dress in Paris

Jul 15, 2017 - 14:27 


Macron said he "remain extremely attached to the framework of the Paris Accord", which has been a major global breakthrough.  Bonjour! How are you?" she said, upon entering a playroom where children gathered around tables laden with building blocks.





Love Island ladies to ask for waxing kits

Jul 15, 2017 - 14:19 


Speaking in the Beach Hut, Mike said: "Olivia says she's single but think I'll be a mug to believe it". You've got Mike, we're more compatible on paper, he is fit, but he's not Chris...


Why Investors remained confident on The Gap, Inc. (GPS), Visa Inc. (V)?

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:51 


The apparel retailer reported $0.36 earnings per share for the quarter, topping the Zacks' consensus estimate of $0.29 by $0.07. Analysts are expecting EPS growth rates to be at -24.10% this quarter and EPS estimate for next year reflect 2.25% growth rate.





India v New Zealand

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:44 


New Zealand's 75-run loss to England in their last match has put them in a precarious position.  The three spots are taken by hosts England, South Africa and defending champions Australia.





IIFA 2017: Katrina Kaif wants one of Alia Bhatt's trophies as 'charity'

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:29 


Salman Khan and Katrina Kaif made up for a sizzling chemistry during the first event of the IIFA 2017 ceremony. We tell you how it all happened.





Pakistan fully aware of designs of hostile agencies: CJCSC

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:17 


The commission term included 100 cadets, including 72 Pakistan Navy cadets and 28 cadets from Saudi Arabia, Qatar and Bahrain.  He said Pakistan seeks peaceful coexistence with all its neighbors.





Embajador de Perú volverá a Ecuador tras suspensión de muro en frontera

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:13 


A comienzos de junio pasado, el Perú expresó su preocupación y pidió explicaciones a Ecuador por la construcción del muro . Perú y Ecuador comparten 1.500 km de límites, gran parte en la selva de la Amazonia.





Morreu Liu Xiaobo, o Nobel da Paz

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:13 


O presidente alemão, Frank-Walter Steinmeier, afirmou que o chinês "só queria o melhor para o seu país e continuará inesquecível". Depois de ter sido autorizada a viajar até Shenyang para estar com o marido antes de ele morrer, o seu paradeiro é agora incerto.





Translator in Trump Jr. meeting identified as ex-State Dept. contractor

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:10 


Ahkmetshin told AP that he did not consider the meeting to be "substantive" and had been expecting a "more serious" conversation. Akhmetshin told AP he does not know if Veselnitskaya's documents were provided by the Russian government .





Jared Kushner's Lawyer Stepping Back From Russia Probe

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:07 


Ty Cobb will also be officially joining White House staff as a "special counsel" to Trump. To read this article in one of Houston's most-spoken languages, click on the button below.





Democratic Congressman Accuses Trump of Coordination With Putin

Jul 15, 2017 - 13:07 


Chuck Grassley (R-Iowa) who described him as a Russian immigrant "acting as an unregistered agent for Russian interest" with "ties to Russian intelligence".





Chinese delegation makes second largest USA  soy purchase

Jul 15, 2017 - 12:58 


A delegation of commodity importers from China signed agreements on Thursday to buy 12.53 million tonnes of US soybeans. The $4.5 Billion deal to buy 460 million bushels of soybeans comes a week before Gov.





Wenger reveals he has exchanged messages with Alexis Sanchez over player's future

Jul 15, 2017 - 12:43 


The once-promising midfielder spent last season on loan at Bournemouth, where he broke his leg in the latter part of the season. But Sanchez will return to training at the end of the month.





Watch Trump Suffer a Daft Punk Medley for Bastille Day

Jul 15, 2017 - 12:34 


It's Bastille Day today, France's national day, and USA president Donald Trump is the guest of honour. Pretty sure Donald Trump has no idea who Daft Punk are.











 





 



















Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











David Gilreath, Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC: Profile & Biography - Bloomberg


































































  



























Feedback





David "Dave" Gilreath

Mng Director/Founding Principal,
Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC






Career History




Co-Manager
Sheaff Brock Intellibuild Growth, 9/2013-PRESENT


Co-Manager
Sheaff Brock Covered Call Income, 9/2010-PRESENT


Chief Compliance Ofcr
Salzinger Sheaff Brock LLC, PRESENT


Chief Compliance Officer
Sbauer Funds LLC, PRESENT


Mng Director/Founding Principal
Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC, PRESENT


Co-Founder
Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC, 2001-UNKNOWN


Chief Compliance Officer
Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC, 10/2001-UNKNOWN


Mng Dir/Founding Principal
Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC, FORMER



Bache Halsey Stuart Shield, FORMER


VP:Investments
Dean Witter Financial, FORMER


Show More







Corporate Information
Address:



Phone:
-


Fax:
-











From The Web












Personal Information



Education



University of Miami
Bachelor's Degree








Awards & Publications



Certificates




Certified Financial Planner (CFP), 1984









Sponsored Financial Commentaries







More From The Web


















Home


News


Top Headlines
Most Popular
Exclusive
Law
Entrepreneurs
Leaders
Economy
Environment
Science
Sports
Markets Magazine
Pursuits Magazine
Bloomberg Visual Data
Bloomberg Best (and Worst)
For comments or complaints about news coverage click here


Regions
U.S.
China
Europe
Asia
U.K. & Ireland
Australia & New Zealand
Canada
India & Pakistan
Japan
Africa
Eastern Europe
Latin America
Middle East
Markets
Commodities
Currencies
Bonds
Stocks
Energy Markets
Municipal Bonds
Emerging Markets
Funds
Islamic Finance
Industries
Energy
Technology
Real Estate
Finance
Health Care
Transportation
Insurance
Retail
Media
Manufacturing




Quick


Market Data


Stocks
Stock Futures
World Indexes
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Gainers & Losers
Earnings Calendar
Industry Leaders
Currencies
Americas
Europe, Middle East, & Africa
Asia-Pacific
Foreign Exchange Cross Rates
FX Fixings
Currency Converter
Forex Trading Videos
Commodities
Energy Prices
Metals Prices
Agricultural Prices


Rates & Bonds
US Treasuries
UK Gilts
Germany Bunds
Japan Bonds
Australia Bonds
Bloomberg Bond Indexes
Corporate Bonds
Consumer Rates
Economic Calendar
Watchlist
European Debt Crisis
Symbol Search
The Market Now




Personal Finance


Top Headlines
Saving & Investing
Real Estate
Retirement Planning
Financial Advisers
Taxes
Blog: Ventured & Gained
Real Cost Of
Money Gallery
Calculators
Watchlist (Portfolio Tracker)




Tech


Top Headlines
Social Media
Mobile & Wireless
Web
Enterprise Tech
TV, Games & Movies
Apple
Tech Deals
Global Tech
Slideshows
Videos




U.S. Politics


Sustainability


Top Headlines
Energy
Corporate Sustainability
Policy
Natural Resources
Health & Population
Slideshows
Videos
Blog: The Grid




Luxury


Top Headlines
Autos
Billionaires
Living
Property
Travel
Well Spent
Loot Blog
Pursuits Magazine
Videos




TV


Live TV
Channel Finder
Personalities
Apple TV
iPad App
Schedule
U.S.
Asia
Europe


Shows
Surveillance
Market Makers
Lunch Money
Street Smart
Bloomberg West
Game Changers




Video


Must See
Latest
Live TV
Shows
Playlist




Radio


Live Radio
Shows
Schedule
Personalities
Podcasts
Bloomberg Brief
Featured Podcasts and New Shows
Bloomberg View
Masters in Business
First Word
Surveillance
Bloomberg Advantage
In the Loop
Bloomberg Law
Taking Stock
Bloomberg Best
More Podcasts




Blogs


Global Tech
The Grid
Loot
The Market Now
Political Capital
Tech Deals
Ventured and Gained




Opinion




My Saved



Registration



Sign In



Bloomberg.com



Businessweek.com



Company



About
Blog
Careers
Diversity & Inclusion
News Mission
Philanthropy & Engagement
Press Room
Procurement
Sustainability




Products



Financial Products
Bloomberg Professional Service
Bloomberg Anywhere
Bloomberg Tradebook
Bloomberg Briefs
Bloomberg Indexes
Bloomberg SEF
Service Center
Customer Support
Enterprise Products
Enterprise Solutions
Trading Solutions
Industry Products
Bloomberg BNA
Bloomberg Government
Bloomberg Law
Bloomberg Link
Bloomberg New Energy Finance
Bloomberg Sports
Content Licensing




Bloomberg Anywhere



Mobile Apps



Bloomberg Visual Data



































Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft
















Sheaff Brock Portfolio Strategies































Access your
Client Account



Join a
WEB CONFERENCE



REGISTER FOR a Free

Insights Guide




















Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC

















Most people get interested in stocks when everyone else is. The time to get interested is when no one else is. You can’t buy what is popular and do well.
—Warren Buffett
 

 




                                       					﻿


 Sheaff Brock Portfolio Strategies 


The reason you have a portfolio is because diversification just makes sense: no intelligent investor would put all their money into one single stock. But investors can also get into trouble spreading themselves too thin trying to avoid risk when what they really want is higher returns.
Now factor in the reality that equities and securities change all the time—in price, relative valuation, yield and attractiveness. So how can you manage the right blend of equities and other instruments over time?
At Sheaff Brock, we specialize in putting together innovative portfolios for the Intelligent Investor. And because we're strictly fee-only, our success is linked to your success.
We offer portfolio solutions to address your specific goals for income and growth, and we manage customer accounts on a discretionary basis for growth, growth-and-income, tactical allocation, or just income. We also custom-blend portfolios to achieve very specific goals and risk tolerance.
Here′s a look at our primary portfolio types and characteristics.
Innovative Portfolio Options
Growth Portfolios:

IntelliBuilD® Growth—The 33 fundamentally strongest growth stocks from lists generated by Investor’s Business Daily.
Bulls of the Dow—The 10 fundamentally strongest stocks in the Dow Jones Industrial Average, rebalanced quarterly.
Mid-Cap 10—An aggressive growth portfolio of up to ten mid-cap stocks trading on the NASDAQ exchange and powered by a momentum algorithm.

Growth-and-Income Portfolios:

Dividend Growth and Income—A high quality portfolio of about 25 stocks with high and growing dividend income. A “dividend capture” strategy is often used to enhance our client’s yield.
Covered Call Income—High quality stocks with out-of-the-money covered calls written on every position. The primary objectives are high income from short-term capital gains and capital appreciation.

Income Portfolios:

Preferred Stock Income—A portfolio of corporate preferred stocks with an objective of high income and capital preservation.
Core Plus Bonds—A blend of individual high grade and high yield corporate bonds with capital preservation as the primary objective and income a secondary objective.
High Yield Bonds—A blend of individual high yield corporate bonds with high income as the primary objective and capital preservation a secondary objective.

Alternative Portfolios:

Alternative Strategies—A blend of hard assets, foreign equities and currencies, and other alternative investments that provides broad exposure to non-U.S. dollar products.

Option Overlays:

These are very specialized products; please click here for more information.

Remember, you’ve earned your success and you own it. We never take custody of your assets. We establish, maintain, and manage your portfolio on your behalf through a large, recognized custodian. We move as quickly as needed to manage your account, and you are kept completely informed of every transaction that takes place within your portfolio. When you have input, or even just a question, we listen.
If you'd like to learn more about Sheaff Brock and our approach, feel free to contact us.




 






Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft











Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC                                                                                    - Indianapolis                                      , IN         - Company Information









 



























Products
Resources
My Account












Talk to a D&B Advisor 
1-800-280-0780 




Business Directory



IN



Indianapolis



Investment Advice



Investment Advisory Service



                            Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC
                                    



 





















S 


Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC                                                                                   



10401 N MERIDIAN ST # 100 INDIANAPOLIS, IN 46290
Get Directions



(317) 705-5700
www.sheaffbrock.com                                                                                     





Business Info



 Founded 2001
 Incorporated IN
 Annual Revenue $1,100,000.00
 Employee Count 6
 Industries Investment Advisory Service
 Contacts David Gilreath                                                                                                          







Contact Business







Your Email Address

Subject:


Message


Send Message





Company Summary


You've worked hard for your money. Let us make it work for you.Fee Only Portfolio ManagementAs a fee only money manager our focus









VERIFIED Status:
UNVERIFIED



Address:
UNVERIFIED





LAST VERIFIED:

                                    --
                                



Phone:

                                    UNVERIFIED
                                





Payment Method:
UNVERIFIED


view full report





Similar Businesses Nearby


                                        Our similar businesses nearby shows similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Competitive Landscape


                                        Our competitive landscape shows how this business compares to similar businesses in their industry and region based on information found in their Dun & Bradstreet Credibility Review profile.                                        







Payments Accepted

NO DATA



Hours



                                        Sunday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Monday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Tuesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Wednesday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Thursday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Friday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        



                                        Saturday 

                                        

                                                                                            --
                                            
                                        







S

VIEW ADDITIONAL DATA                        
Select from over 115 networks below to view available data about this business. If this data is unavailable or inaccurate and you own or represent this business, click here for more information on how you may be able to correct it. 







Credibility Review





Google





Facebook.com





Yellowbook.com





Bing.com





Yellowpages.com





MerchantCircle





Tele Atlas (TomTom)





Twitter.com





AOL





MapQuest





Yahoo Local





Apple/Siri





Groupon





Hotfrog.com





Comcast.net Search





ReachLocal





Admedia





Dealsplus





Shoptopia.com





Alteryx





Dogtime Media





KSL.com





Sirtune





AmericanTowns.com





Driverside





Kudzu.com





SpecialsAgent.com





Answers.com





eGood





LawInfo.com





spotlikes.com





anywho.com





eGumball





Likeness.com





Spotzot





eServiceLog





MapMyRun





TechnoCom





apartmentguide.com





ezlocal.com





EZToUse.com





Teleroute





AroundMe.com





metropolist.com





Therapists.com





Atlanta NewHomes





FindLaw.com





Time Out New York





Avantar





FindTheBest.com





mojopages.com





B2B Yellowpages





Fivestar Software





MyCityWay.com





TripAdvisor





bckyrd.com





GiftCards.com





MyCoupons.com





beachcalifornia.com





GoLocal247.com





mymove.com





UpMeSocial.com





Belo





GoodInfo





News-Gazette





Nokia





usdirectory.com





Cars.com





Nomao





Centzy.com





hibu





Openlist.com





ChaCha Search





Homeplate.com





OwnLocal.com





VisiKard





challama.com





Homestore





patch.com





Voltari





CityBot





Pelopidas





Vouchd





ClassifiedAds





Hostway





PlaceIQ





WalkScore.com





CloudMade





Hoodoyou





PlanetDiscover.com





WeddingWire.com





PowerProfiles





Where Inc.





Contractors.com





iGoLocal.com





Radiate Media





Wikiocity





CouponMap





Indeed.com





Wimgo.com





CrowdSpot





Innova Electronics





Intellistrand





realtor.com





DataSphere





InTheMO.com





Reply.com





Yellowbot.com





JiWire





Rocket Fuel





YellowPageCity.com





DMV.org





Justclicklocal.com





Dirxion





Keen.com





Zidster.com












Photos














































Business Credit Report
Receive a one-time comprehensive credit report on this company.
get full credit report


Facebook








Twitter








Yelp






































Call 1.800.280.0780 to speak with a D&B Advisor Today!







Customer Resources
Products
Education Center
Business Articles & Insights
Glossary
Contact Us
Customer Support
Communication Preferences
Search for D&B D-U-N-S




Our Company
About Us
Company History
Business Credit History
Careers
Press Releases
News
Success Stories
Hoovers




Our Network
Partners
Affiliates
Blog
Access to Capital
Entrepreneurial Initiative
D&B International
SupplierEdge




Site Links
Business Directory
Site Map
PIPEDA
Privacy Policy
Website Terms of Service
Product License Agreement







© Dun & Bradstreet, Inc. 2017. All rights reserved.






















The Experienced Investment Advisors at Sheaff Brock






































Access your
Client Account



Join a
WEB CONFERENCE



REGISTER FOR a Free

Insights Guide




















Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC







 



 


























 


 











If you want to be successful, it's just this simple.
Know what you are doing.Love what you are doing.And believe in what you are doing.
— Will Rogers

 




                                       					﻿


 The Experienced Investment Advisors at Sheaff Brock 


The team at Sheaff Brock offers decades of experience as investment advisors and prides itself on our personalized approach. We don’t just manage your portfolio. We provide you with analysis, educate you about market environments and report on your investment performance. We work to understand your needs, not just when you first come to us, but throughout our relationship. 
At Sheaff Brock, our entire team is dedicated to your success.
Sheaff Brock's Managing Directors
Our managing directors include Sheaff Brock founders Dave Gilreath and Ron Brock.





David S. Gilreath, CFP,® Managing Director and Chief Investment Officer




David S. Gilreath, CFP,® Managing Director and Chief Investment Officer
As a founding principal of Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC, Dave shares responsibility for setting investment policy, asset allocation, and security selection for the company's managed accounts. He also consults with the clients of Sheaff Brock on overall portfolio construction.
Dave has more than 25 years of experience in the financial services industry, beginning with Bache Halsey Stuart Shields and later with Morgan Stanley/Dean Witter. Dave is a featured contributor giving money management advice in Market Moves, a monthly investment column for ABCNews.com.
He attended Miami University in Oxford, Ohio where he earned a Bachelor of Science degree. Dave went on to obtain his Certified Financial Planner® (CFP) designation in 1984.







Ron Brock, Managing Director




Ron Brock, Managing Director

As a founding principal of Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC, Ron shares responsibility for setting investment policy, asset allocation, and security selection for the company's managed accounts. He also consults with the clients of Sheaff Brock on overall portfolio construction.
Ron has more than 20 years of experience in the financial services industry, starting with Prudential Bache Securities and later with Morgan Stanley/Dean Witter. 
He attended the Indiana University School of Business where he earned a Bachelor of Science degree in accounting.




Compliance





Audrey Kurzawa, CPA, Chief Compliance Officer/Director of Risk Management and Oversight




Audrey Kurzawa, CPA, Chief Compliance Officer/Director of Risk Management and Oversight

Audrey’s experience includes all aspects of accounting, compliance and financial management, having most recently served as chief operating officer for Wallington Asset Management. In her previous role at Winthrop Capital Management, Audrey designed, developed and implemented the firm’s strategic compliance program. Other experience included corporate finance positions at 40|86 Advisors and Conseco, Inc. in the Indianapolis area and KPMG Peat Marwick in Chicago.
Audrey holds a B.S. in Accounting from Indiana University, Bloomington. A certified public accountant, she holds a FINRA Series 65 license, is a Fellow of the Life Management Institute, and is a member of the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.
Married with two children and two dogs, Audrey’s hobbies include running and watching her children compete in swimming and soccer. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Bryant Scott, Compliance Manager




Bryant Scott, Compliance Manager

Having worked with Charles Schwab for ten years, Bryant focused on regulatory and compliance issues as a branch operations manager, serving more recently as an active trading representative. Bryant has more than 17 years of experience as a licensed broker, working with the southern California firms of Charles Schwab, UnionBanc Investment Services, Farmers Financial Solutions, Dreyfus Brokerage and TD Waterhouse.
Bryant is a graduate of Indiana University. Contact Bryant via email at This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it..




Portfolio Managers





Edward "JR" Humphreys II, CFA, CAIA, Senior Portfolio Manager




Edward "JR" Humphreys II, CFA, CAIA, Senior Portfolio Manager

JR’s experience as a financial consultant spans more than 25 years, and he has worked extensively in alternative asset allocations and the creation of equity selection processes to achieve greater quantitative and more disciplined equity selections. Working much of that time as a portfolio manager at BKD Wealth Advisor, JR previously served as a trust investment officer at United National Bank in West Virginia, and as a senior options specialist in the active trader division at Charles Schwab in Indianapolis.
JR holds a Bachelor of Business Administration degree in Finance from Marshall University in Huntington, West Virginia, where he was also a member of Omicron Delta Epsilon, International Honor Society for Economics.
He is a member of the CFA Society of Indianapolis and serves as Treasurer and Board Member of Morning Dove Therapeutic Riding in Zionsville, Indiana. JR lives in Zionsville with his three children. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Wally Taggart, Portfolio Manager




Wally Taggart, Portfolio Manager

Wally Taggart began his investment career with Paine Webber in 1963, becoming one of the first brokers in Indianapolis to use options and to become a Registered Options Principal with the CBOE. He spent over 30 years as a broker and in branch management with Paine Webber, Dean Witter, and Morgan Stanley. Wally claims he is most famous for being a successful street racer in his father’s Hudson Hornet—on the west side of Chicago in the mid-fifties!
After a decade of “retirement,” Sheaff Brock persuaded him to come back to work and help with trading. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.




Financial Planning Group





Paul Coan CFP,® ChFC, CEA®




Paul Coan CFP,® ChFC, CEA®

Paul is the head of our Financial Planning Group and the Mid-Cap 10 portfolio manager for Sheaff Brock. Experienced in financial, retirement and estate planning, Paul is the author of numerous books on financial planning, the past president of the Financial Planning Association of Greater Indiana, and a registered advisory with the fee-only National Association of Personal Financial Advisors (NAPFA).
Paul helps his clients with financial issues from tax strategies to retirement and estate planning and risk management, and has earned high marks as a wealth advisor from Worth Magazine, Consumer’s Research Council and Bloomberg’s Wealth Manager.
Paul is a graduate of Florida State University. Contact Paul at 317-705-5109 or This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it..




Our Client Solutions Teams
Our client solutions teams have one goal: to work closely with you to meet your financial needs and, as a result, achieve your unsurpassed satisfaction and loyalty. Please feel free to contact any of our client solutions advisors directly.
 





Peter Bjelopetrovich, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant




Peter Bjelopetrovich, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant

Peter began his investment advisory career at Charles Schwab as a customer service representative and then as a broker in Indianapolis. He became part of Schwab’s Active Trader specialty team, servicing their most active traders and developing a deep knowledge of options, margin accounts and trading. Peter also served as an Associate Financial Consultant at the branch level in Illinois before joining Sheaff Brock.
Peter earned his degree in Public Relations with a marketing minor from University of Dayton. It was during a bartending stint that he developed a love of craft beers and Irish whiskey. He enjoys wine tasting and sampling beer with his wife, cooking, and spending time with his young son. Peter is an avid enthusiast for basketball and anything that is Michael Jordan-related.
Born and raised in Park Ridge, Illinois, his last name is pronounced Bello (rhymes with Jello® but the “j” is silent) Petro Vich. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







David Chapin, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant




David Chapin, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant

David’s experience includes five years at Charles Schwab, where his most recent role was as a senior derivatives trading specialist on the options trading desk. His background in option strategy building, technical analysis, and trade guidance helps clients manage risk and find new paths of wealth creation and income-building. Prior financial experience includes six years in accounting roles at Conseco Services, LLC, and Bucheri, McCarty & Metz, LLP.
With support from Administrative Coordinator Susan Williams, David provides investment consultation, advice, and guidance to Sheaff Brock clients.
David holds a B.S. in Finance & Economics, and a separate degree in Accounting, both from Indiana University, Kokomo. Married with two children, David spends much of his spare time remodeling their 100-year old house. He also helps coach his son’s baseball, basketball, and soccer youth sports teams. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Seth Hickle, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant




Seth Hickle, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant

Seth has many years of experience in commodities futures and options, equity-based derivatives, and high net-worth trading, where he accumulated skills both in working directly with clients and as a manager—assisting and guiding small, dedicated teams in complex trading issues.
Prior to joining Sheaff Brock, Seth was a Senior High Net Worth Active Trading Specialist at Charles Schwab and a Senior Derivatives Trading Manager at Schwab and optionsXpress. He assisted with the integration of optionsXpress into the Schwab enterprise, as well as the launch of Schwab Futures. Previously, Seth was a Commodity Futures and Options Broker with LaSalle Futures Group in Chicago.
While pursuing his B.S. degree in Finance and Economics at Ball State University, Seth led a student team managing a $500,000 small and large cap equity portfolio for the Ball State University Endowment.
When not immersed in the world of investments, Seth enjoys outdoor activities, typically around water—fishing, waterfowl hunting, and kayaking—usually with a mug of coffee. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







James "Louie" Humphries, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant




James "Louie" Humphries, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant

Louie is an experienced financial services professional with an intricate knowledge of options, margin and advanced trading strategies. As a trading and IPO specialist at Charles Schwab & Company, he provided proactive account service to help his clients achieve their financial solutions and retirement goals. Prior experience in retail management developed his focus on strong customer service.
Louie works with Sheaff Brock clients to help them achieve their investment goals, with support from Administrative Coordinator Susan Williams.
Louie received his degree in Public Affairs from Indiana University and is currently pursuing a law degree with a focus on Securities Regulation and Regulatory Compliance, also from IU. He also has a passion for cooking—simplifying and modernizing culinary classics—and for building custom furniture. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Teri Kane, Vice President—Client Solutions, Administrative Coordinator




Teri Kane, Vice President—Client Solutions, Administrative Coordinator
Teri began her career at Prudential Securities in 1989 and moved to Morgan Stanley/Dean Witter in 1990. Beginning as a registered sales assistant, Teri later moved into the role of account executive, where she gained experience and enjoyment in equity options.
Teri handles the onboarding process of new accounts at Sheaff Brock and maintains the ongoing administrative functions of client accounts for portfolio consultant Chris Crisci.
Teri enjoys gardening and crafting and serves as a youth leader with her husband. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Deb McCulley, Vice President—Client Solutions




Deb McCulley, Vice President—Client Solutions

Deb is responsible for portfolio administration, reconciliation of accounts, and general office functions. With more than 20 years in the financial services industry, Deb began in operations with E.F. Hutton, and later moved to Morgan Stanley/Dean Witter as an assistant. Prior to joining Sheaff Brock, Deb was most recently with Star Wealth Management.
Deb enjoys antique shopping and biking. Her love of food and craft beers motivates her to try out a lot of new restaurants. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Michael Richardt, Vice President—Client Solutions, Administrative Coordinator




Michael Richardt, Vice President—Client Solutions, Administrative Coordinator

Michael started his financial career with Charles Schwab as a customer service representative, earning awards for excellence and productivity in service. He later became a Financial Advisor for Planned Investment Co., Inc. and Edward Jones, helping clients reach their investment goals through investments in stocks, ETFs, bonds, mutual funds, life insurance, annuities and educational 529 plans.
At Sheaff Brock, Michael works with portfolio consultants Craig Bond and Mark Vandygriff, providing administrative support for Sheaf Brock clients.
Michael is an Indiana University graduate. He enjoys hiking, backpacking and whitewater rafting. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Mark Vandygriff, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant




Mark Vandygriff, Vice President—Client Solutions, Portfolio Consultant

After gaining lending and banking experience with HSBC, Union Equity Corporation and Homeland Mortgage, Mark worked at Charles Schwab providing investment services, support and guidance to high net worth clients. His in-depth knowledge of investor tools and research allowed him to identify wealth management needs and solutions, and also offer technical analysis and trading guidance, earning several customer service awards.
Mark serves as Portfolio Consultant for Sheaff Brock clients, with administrative support from Michael Richardt.
Mark spent eight years as a Unit Supply Specialist Reservist with the US Army during and immediately after college. His degree is in business with a concentration in finance from Indiana University, South Bend. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.






Susan Williams, Vice President—Client Solutions, Administrative Coordinator




Susan Williams, Vice President—Client Solutions, Administrative Coordinator
Susan began her career in the financial industry in 1994 with the American Funds (now known as the Capital Group) as a supervisor in their Indianapolis Operations Department. Later working with One America as a Retirement Plans Consultant, Susan then moved to Charles Schwab where, as a client representative, she developed a body of knowledge regarding IRAs, trust accounts and estate resolution.
Susan brings 20-plus years of client service experience to the Sheaff Brock Client Solutions Team and provides administrative support for portfolio consultants David Chapin and James Humphries.
In her spare time, Susan enjoys gardening, traveling, and watching movies, and she keeps in shape by walking and working out with weights. Her newest hobby is playing with her young grandson, Jayden. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Shannon McGeorge, Research and Statistics Administrator




Shannon McGeorge, Research and Statistics Administrator

Shannon gained experience as a loan underwriter/credit analyst at Wells Fargo prior to joining Sheaff Brock as a research and statistics administrator.
Originally from northern Virginia, Shannon graduated from the University of New Mexico in 2014 with double majors in Economics and Anthropology. While at UNM, she was the President and Founding Member of Omicron Delta Epsilon (an Economics Honor Society) and Vice President of the Game Theory Association.   
Shannon lived in Germany for five years and is a frequent traveler, having visited more than 20 countries. She is also a huge car enthusiast. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.




Our National Sales Team
With a breadth of experience in the financial services industry, our sales team members are focused on first understanding your needs and then working toward investment performance solutions to meet your goals. Feel free to contact any sales team member directly for more information.





Jim Murphy, CFP,® CAIA, Director/National Sales Manager—Investments




Jim Murphy, CFP,® CAIA, Director/National Sales Manager—Investments

With more than 25 years in the financial services industry, Jim has extensive experience in wealth management and portfolio consulting for high net worth clients.  His background includes several years in organizational leadership, including regional and national wholesale distribution management, as well as financial consulting.  His strength is in helping others—whether clients, peers, or colleagues—achieve their desired outcomes.
Prior to joining Sheaff Brock as head of the investment team, Jim led more than 100 investment professionals while also handling oversight of client assets at Schwab Private Client Investment Advisory, a wholly-owned subsidiary of Charles Schwab and Company. He previously was responsible for strategic direction as Senior VP and National Sales Manager of Alternative Distribution for ING Investment Management. He also held positions as Regional Vice President for MFS Mutual Funds, and as Financial Consultant for Fidelity Investments.
Jim holds a Bachelor's degree in Business Finance from University of Arizona. He holds the CFP® designation and is a current charter holder of the CAIA. Jim is married with two sons and currently resides in Scottsdale, Arizona. In his spare time, you can find him golfing, sailing, or snow skiing. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Wendy Hales, CFP,® CWS,® Vice President—Investments




Wendy Hales, CFP,® CWS,® Vice President—Investments

Wendy has more than 14 years of experience in financial planning and investment management for both individual and institutional clients. Her focus has been helping high net worth individuals with investment management, financial analysis, risk management, tax planning, retirement planning, estate planning, insurance, employee benefits and stock option plans. She also assisted some of the largest non-profit employers in Silicon Valley with  retirement benefit plans, employee education, and executive compensation.
Wendy graduated with a bachelor of arts degree from Utah State University. She lived and worked in Taiwan for four years and speaks fluent Mandarin Chinese. Wendy loves adventuring with her family—skiing, mountain biking, rock climbing, surfing, scuba diving and, most of all, traveling. She has traveled to more than 40 different countries and stepped foot on every continent, including Antarctica. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Christy Jordan, Senior Vice President—Investments




Christy Jordan, Senior Vice President—Investments
Christy spent the decade of the nineties in Chicago on the sales and marketing side of the mutual fund and managed account industry. She worked with Paine Webber/Mitchell Hutchins, the Munder Funds, and Duff & Phelps before "retiring" to raise a family.
She re-entered the industry with Sheaff Brock in 2010 to assist in our national sales efforts. Christy earned a B.A. from Purdue and attended Studio Arts Center International in Florence, Italy. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Jim McMahon, Senior Vice President—Investments




Jim McMahon, Senior Vice President—Investments

Jim worked for the Indiana Secretary of State in the Securities Division prior to joining Morgan Stanley/Dean Witter in 1986.
While at Morgan Stanley/Dean Witter, Jim developed his own successful investment style and philosophy, and went on to achieve the title of Senior Vice-President of Investments. Jim graduated from Manchester College in 1982, where he earned an accounting degree.
Having played golf in high school and college, Jim still loves to play the game. He runs, swims, and waterskis to stay active, and he tracks stats for a local high school basketball team during their season. Jim and his wife have five children and one granddaughter. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Paul Meinville, Vice President—Investments




Paul Meinville, Vice President—Investments
Paul has extensive industry experience in helping individual investors. He began his career in the 1980’s at Schwab, where he advanced through the ranks during twenty years to become Regional Vice President. Subsequently he served in management roles at Raymond James and Ameriprise.
Paul grew up in the Philadelphia area, now resides in New Jersey, and assists Sheaff Brock with our national sales efforts. He earned a B.A. from Temple University.
In his local community, Paul has served on the Count Basie Centennial Committee and the Monmouth University Scholarship Fund Committee. He enjoys working out, boating, snowmobiling, skiing, playing golf, and traveling. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.






Brad Miksek, Vice President—Investments




Brad Miksek, Vice President—Investments
After 11 years as both an account manager for Schwab’s Institutional Sales Group and a Relationship Manager assisting its Service Group, Brad served as an Investment Advisor Representative consulting with high net worth clients at J.E. Simmons & Co. He later developed new client sales and handled ongoing wealth management strategies and programs at Zacks Investment Management for eight years before joining Sheaff Brock’s National Sales Team. Brad has significant experience in bond trading and sales, and mutual funds and commodities trading.
Brad is a graduate of Northern Illinois University. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Ben Widders, Vice President—Investments




Ben Widders, Vice President—Investments

Prior to joining Sheaff Brock, Ben was Vice President for EP Wealth Advisors and a consultant for Charles Schwab and Company, working with business development, client review, analysis and recommendations for high net worth individuals. Ben graduated from The Master’s College and is a candidate for Certified Financial Planning designation.
Active in the community of Santa Clarita where he resides, Ben serves on the Athletic Advisory Committee of the Master’s College Athletic Department and volunteers with youth athletic player development. Ben and his wife, Deborah, have been married since 1999 and have four children, Emily, Matthew, Andrew and Nathan. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Libby Neidlinger, New Account Specialist




Libby Neidlinger, New Account Specialist

Although fairly new to the investment industry, Libby brings a wealth of experience to Sheaff Brock. Prior to taking a few years “off” to raise a family, Libby spent more than a decade at the Indianapolis Motor Speedway in various positions. Most recently she was the Special Events Coordinator for all facets of events, meetings, seminars and receptions including those surrounding the Indianapolis 500, Brickyard 400, Formula One, and Moto GP races. At Sheaff Brock, Libby is responsible for the handling and processing of all paperwork required to open new customer accounts. She also provides support for the Sheaff Brock sales team.
Outside the office, Libby is a swim team and track mom, as well as a school volunteer for her two daughters. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Michelle Ratcliff, New Account Specialist




Michelle Ratcliff, New Account Specialist

Michelle joins Sheaff Brock with more than 25 years of experience in the health insurance industry, where she served in a variety of roles with Prudential Insurance Company and The Principal Financial Group. Her wide-ranging experience includes HR recruiting, reinsurance analyst work, health care predeterminations and claims review, and account service support. At Sheaff Brock, Michelle is responsible for the handling and processing of all paperwork necessary to open new customer accounts and supporting the sales team.
In her free time, she enjoys golfing, playing co-ed sand volleyball, and watching her son play travel baseball. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.




Our Operations Team





Angie Reecer, Director of Client Operations




Angie Reecer, Director of Client Operations

Angie is responsible for overseeing all office functions, reconciliation of accounts, and operations functions. Angie has been involved in the financial services industry for more than 15 years, working in banking, operations with Paine Webber and, most recently, as an administrative assistant with Morgan Stanley/Dean Witter.
Angie spends her free time gardening and working on her hobby farm, which has three miniature donkeys adopted from the Indianapolis Zoo, two pot-bellied pigs, chickens, dogs and cats. She also enjoys running, and has taken part in the Marine Corps Marathon in Washington, D.C. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Kat Harper, Operations Manager




Kat Harper, Operations Manager

As a client service specialist for Charles Schwab, Kat provided client service and support by uncovering client needs and providing education about accounts, product offerings and procedures. After moving to the estate distributions team, she took on a supervisory role involving quality assurance, training, and cashiering supervision. At Sheaff Brock, Kat is responsible for marketing and operations.
Kat graduated with Honors from the Indiana University Kelley School of Business with a B.S. in Marketing. While at IU, she was a Kelley Scholar and a member of the Hutton Honors College, and also studied Germanics and Metalsmithing. In her free time, she enjoys practicing Vinyasa yoga and drinking good coffee. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.







Sheldon Hirst, Controller




Sheldon Hirst, Controller

Sheldon worked as a Certified Public Accountant (CPA) for more than 20 years, with eleven of those in public accounting and several more as an independent business owner. Having served as an independent controller and consultant for several small businesses, Sheldon handles the day-to-day financial aspects of business at Sheaff Brock.
Sheldon received his Bachelor’s degree in Accounting from Indiana University School of Business in Bloomington, Indiana. He is a registered tax return preparer and a member of the Indiana CPA Society. Other interests include his work as a board member of the Jewish Federation of Greater Indianapolis and serving as a past president and board member of the Jewish Community Center of Indianapolis. Sheldon is also an avid weekend warrior basketball player. This email address is being protected from spambots. You need JavaScript enabled to view it.
 




 
 




 





Nike, Inc. (NYSE:NKE) Position Reduced by Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC

































  Titres
                

Imperial Oil Ltd (IMO) Analysts See $0.29 EPS 
Analysts Estimates And Ratings Philip Morris International, Inc. (PM) 
Wells Fargo 'sorry' to 570000 customers with unneeded auto insurance 
Applied Optoelectronics, Inc. (NASDAQ:AAOI) Rating Lowered to Buy at Vetr Inc 
Meghan Markle With Prince Harry At Pippa Middleton's Wedding Reception 
'Mother of all bombs' killed 94 ISIS fighters 
Susan Rice responsible for unmasking intercepts of Trump associates 


























Nouvelles
Financer Culture Science Sport Monde Santé Nationale 




Financer
Culture
Science
Sport
Monde
Santé
Nationale


 


Nike, Inc. (NYSE:NKE) Position Reduced by Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors LLC
Xavier Trudeau
Juillet 21, 2017



Part












Shares of Nike, Inc. The stock increased 0.21% or $0.12 during the last trading session, reaching $57.77. About 1.45M shares traded. It has underperformed by 25.94% the S&P500.The move comes after 6 months positive chart setup for the $98.22B company. After having $0.74 EPS previously, Amaya Inc's analysts see -4.05% EPS growth. Therefore 90% are positive.
Among 33 analysts covering Expedia Inc. The rating was upgraded by Sidoti on Wednesday, August 19 to "Buy". Canaccord Genuity maintained it with "Hold" rating and $52 target in Wednesday, September 28 report. The firm earned "Buy" rating on Thursday, March 17 by Moffett Nathanson. As per Thursday, March 23, the company rating was maintained by FBR Capital. The hedge fund run by Edmond M. Safra held 1.08M shares of the consumer non-durables company at the end of 2016Q4, valued at $54.90M, up from 900,000 at the end of the previous reported quarter. The stock has "Buy" rating by Robert W. Baird on Wednesday, June 21.Investors sentiment increased to 0.98 in 2016 Q4. Its up 0.27, from 1.01 in 2016Q3. The shares were sold at an average price of $56.68, for a total transaction of $5,455,053.24. 112 funds opened positions while 405 raised stakes.The total number of shares percentage held by insiders is about 0.2% while the number of Shares % held by institutions is 83.9%. But now a prominent Wall Street firm is saying the company's financial results will improve and investors should buy the shoe maker's stock. The Ohio-based Strs Ohio has invested 0.25% in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). Stephens Ar stated it has 63,288 shares. Tcw Grp Incorporated has invested 0.04% in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). The New York-based Edge Wealth Mngmt Lc has invested 0.01% in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). Notis invested 0.23% in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). Meag Munich Ergo Kapitalanlagegesellschaft Mbh holds 0.13% or 23,439 shares. Comml Bank Of Nova Scotia holds 548,042 shares. Us State Bank De stated it has 0.31% of its portfolio in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). Chilton Management Limited accumulated 24,649 shares or 1.93% of the stock. Salient Cap Advsr Ltd Llc reported 15,828 shares.Nike, Inc. has a 1-year low of $49.01 and a 1-year high of $60.33. Rhumbline Advisers holds 0% or 38,719 shares.Atlanta Capital Group increased Select Sector Spdr Tr (XLP) stake by 7,848 shares to 114,105 valued at $5.90 million in 2016Q4. It also reduced its holding in Johnson &Johnsn (NYSE:JNJ) by 30,998 shares in the quarter, leaving it with 527,838 shares, and cut its stake in Comcast Cl A (NASDAQ:CMCSA). Spdr Gold Trust (Put) (GLD) was raised too.Analysts await Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE) to report earnings on September, 26. T_AYA's profit would be $105.73 million giving it 7.80 P/E if the $0.71 EPS is correct. The ex-dividend date was Thursday, June 1st. Ayre David J sold 200,000 shares worth $10.62 million. Benchmark maintained the shares of EXPE in report on Monday, July 27 with "Buy" rating.On June 16 the company was downgraded from "Neutral" to "Hold" in a report from JP Morgan. The stock now has a consensus rating of Hold and a consensus price target of $60.95. On Wednesday, September 28 the stock rating was maintained by Robert W. Baird with "Outperform". The company was maintained on Thursday, March 23 by Barclays Capital. The company was maintained on Wednesday, September 28 by Citigroup. The rating was maintained by Credit Suisse on Wednesday, March 23 with "Outperform".Since February 15, 2017, it had 0 buys, and 22 selling transactions for $977.75 million activity. PARKER MARK G had sold 100,000 shares worth $5.55 million on Monday, April 3. Finally, Winslow Evans & Crocker Inc. boosted its stake in shares of Nike by 154.7% in the second quarter. 2 shares valued at $111 were sold by SPRUNK ERIC D on Tuesday, April 4. Alps Advisors owns 10,317 shares or 0% of their United States portfolio. Sg Americas Securities Ltd Liability has 1.07M shares for 0.46% of their portfolio. The total number of Outstanding Shares is 1.32 Billion. Moreover, Copeland Capital Mgmt Llc has 0.45% invested in Expedia Inc (NASDAQ:EXPE). Polen Cap Mgmt Limited reported 10.41 million shares. Syntal Partners Llc holds 6,361 shares. Blackrock Advisors Llc reported 0.17% of its portfolio in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE). Morgan Stanley reported 160,094 shares stake. 4,016 are owned by Alpha Windward. Mirae Asset Glob Ltd, Korea-based fund reported 87,812 shares. Commerzbank Aktiengesellschaft Fi has invested 0.48% in Nike Inc (NYSE:NKE).Receive News & Ratings Via Email - Enter your email address below to receive a concise daily summary of the latest news and analysts' ratings with our FREE daily email newsletter.

 




D'autres rapports CampDesrEcrues 









21 Juillet 2017




Froome survives Tour's final mountain to tighten grip on yellow jersey







Shares in Texas Instruments Incorporated (NASDAQ:TXN) Acquired by Hyman Charles D







People Stopped Watching Porn So They Could Watch Game Of Thrones











21 Juillet 2017




Boyfriend of Middlesex homicide victim arrested in IL 









21 Juillet 2017




Warren Barguil wins as Froome survives on the Izoard









21 Juillet 2017




Exhumation du corps de Dalí : le grand jour est arrivé !











21 Juillet 2017




Mar-a-Lago asks permission to hire 70 foreign workers









21 Juillet 2017




Twins nearing deal for Braves lefty Jaime Garcia









21 Juillet 2017




Greyson Chance, Viral Singing Sensation, Comes Out as Gay











21 Juillet 2017




Microsoft Blocking Windows 10 'Creators Update' for Intel Atom-Based PCs









21 Juillet 2017




Patrick Mahomes Signs Rookie Deal With Kansas City Chiefs









21 Juillet 2017




Judge halts auction after Madonna objects









Articles récents Nouvelles


 
Blizzard Ends Support For Its Games On Windows XP And Vista




 
Gray Television (NYSE:GTN) Receiving Very Favorable Press Coverage, Report Shows




 
Linkin Park Frontman Chester Bennington 1976




Discuter de cet article








 LES PLUS LUS CampDesrEcrues




Eight more Russians cleared to compete at World Championships



"Ce sera la dernière grande bataille" — Chris Froome



Flooding prompts road closures, evacuations in Trempealeau, Buffalo Counties



Digvijay alleges KTR friends' role in Hyderabad drug racket



Aamir Khan and Kiran Rao's Italian sojourn



British PM May to start three-week European holiday on Monday



Jeff Sessions' Justice Department reinstates asset forfeitures



President Trump's latest explanation of Trumpcare is nonsense



Vainqueur de la 17eme étape, Roglic ne s'en remet pas



Las Vegas party the flawless  Open warm-up for Koepka







SUIVRE NOTRE JOURNAL











DERNIERES NOUVELLES CampDesrEcrues



 
Imperial Oil Ltd (IMO) Analysts See $0.29 EPS


Analysts Estimates And Ratings Philip Morris International, Inc. (PM)


Wells Fargo 'sorry' to 570000 customers with unneeded auto insurance


Applied Optoelectronics, Inc. (NASDAQ:AAOI) Rating Lowered to Buy at Vetr Inc


Snap Inc. (NYSE:SNAP) Upgraded by Vetr Inc. to Hold


Bénéfice inattendu et relèvement des objectifs — Bombardier


Camden Property Trust (NASDAQ:CPT) To Release Earnings


Celestica, Inc. (NYSE:CLS) Issues Q3 Earnings Guidance


FDA Seeks to Reduce Nicotine Levels in Cigarettes to Nonaddictive Levels


Aldi's £10 gin beats £40 rival to be named world's best







AUTRES NOUVELLES


Science
Culture
Financer









Partnering with Australian medical device company Cochlear Ltd, techno...









Will Prompto, Gladiolus, Noctis and Ignis be on-board to provide the b...









Mais attention tout de même au son qui n'est pas si génial que ça! A l...









Il pourrait s'agir de la conséquence d'une retombée mal négociée après...









Quel que soit votre premier choix, rappelons que  Monster Hunter World...












An insider told  The Sun:  "He played an iconic character and everyone...









Lamar is also scheduled to return to Chicago for another concert on Au...









As for  George Clooney , the longtime bachelor who recently settled do...









A few days ago,  Varun  and Shoojit announced the film. The two might ...









L'avocate libano-britannique a donné naissance à des jumeaux, une fill...












Other institutional investors also recently modified their holdings of...









Amgen Inc now has $126.60B valuation. By watching how many shares are ...









Say, for example, that a customer agreed to a monthly payment of $275 ...








The stock's 50 day moving average price is $72.31 and its 200-day movi...









Nine analysts have rated the stock with a sell rating, twenty have ass...
























© 2017 campdesrecrues.com, CampDesrEcrues




Sport
Science
Culture
Financer


Nationale
Santé
Monde





Edition

Nos Contacts
















Home

















































Advice to the Advisors 866.575.5700
 

HomeAbout UsOur Investment ApproachThe Sheaff Brock Institutional TeamThe Sheaff Brock Regional VP'sStrategiesMoney ManagementPortfolio StrategiesAdvisor ResourcesAdvisor ResourcesRegister For An AccountResources For AdvisorsBusiness Builder SeriesManagement AgreementAdvice to the AdvisorsLogin




















Remember Me



Log in





			Forgot your username?



			Forgot your password?







Not a Member?  Register Here


ContactContact Us 



 





Innovative investment strategies
		







Innovative investment strategies
		


 



 




 Home 







Growth. Strength. Security.
These are just a few of the long-term investment goals when managing money and portfolio performance for your clients. So why not diversify your resources to achieve them—by adding the knowledge and resources of an experienced investment advisory firm?
Sheaff Brock Institutional Group is a team of experienced investment managers that partners with a growing list of RIAs, financial intermediaries, and high net-worth investors to provide money management and other strategic financial services. Utilizing their proprietary, innovative portfolio designs, Sheaff Brock's goal is to help you grow your business by taking on the responsibilities of managing the investment strategy—and leaving you to do what you do best.
Based on the unique needs of your group or your clients, the Sheaff Brock Institutional Team can partner in either an advisory or sub-advisory basis to help you achieve investment objectives and fiduciary obligations. Giving you access to all the resources and experience of the Sheaff Brock team, and freeing you up to bring in more clients, better serve them, and build a bigger, more successful business.






We provide money management services to registered investment advisors, helping them fill potential gaps in their investment product offerings.



The Sheaff Brock Institutional Team can offer strategic investment options to help guard your institutional assets against losses while striving to generate greater yield.



Sheaff Brock Institutional Group can provide a full range of investment services to banks and other institutions that offer private wealth management services to their clients. 


Disclosures
Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC is a federally registered investment adviser with the SEC. This web site is informational only, intended for institutional investors, and does not replace the form ADV Part 2 or fact sheets for the highlighted portfolio offerings.


Sheaff Brock Institutional Group
Indianapolis, Indiana


866.575.5700



info@sheaffbrock.com





Advisor Login




















Remember Me



Log in





			Forgot your username?



			Forgot your password?








HomeAbout UsOur Investment ApproachThe Sheaff Brock Institutional TeamThe Sheaff Brock Regional VP'sStrategiesMoney ManagementPortfolio StrategiesAdvisor ResourcesRegister For An AccountResources For AdvisorsBusiness Builder SeriesManagement AgreementAdvice to the AdvisorsContactContact Us
















        
    Investment Advisory Service - Central Indiana Accredited Businesses

    











































Central Indiana Home /
                BBB Accredited Business Directory / 
                Investment Advisory Service



                BBB Accredited Business Directory
            
Businesses you can trust in Central Indiana

Investment Advisory Service








Category 

Category
Business Name







            near
        




  





indy
accredited-business-directory
Auto Search
Auto Location













Back to Map




Filter results





Are you looking for?


Investment Management


Investment Securities


Show More...




by City / Location:


Indianapolis, IN


Fishers, IN


DeMotte, IN




by Content:


View Listings with Coupons & Special Offers







Results for:
Investment Advisory Service
    
           in Central Indiana







BBB








 





					Cameron Financial Services, Inc.


11650 Lantern Road #231 Fishers, IN 46038
(map)


800-863-4588   


				BBB Accredited since
								2016
				
			



Find us on:









BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Creative Benefit Resources, Inc.


7915 S Emerson Avenue #130 Indianapolis, IN 46237
(map)


317-490-1686   


				BBB Accredited since
								2008
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Creative Financial Group


6838 S East Street Indianapolis, IN 46227
(map)


317-788-1562   


				BBB Accredited since
								2014
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Financial Arts, Inc.


921 S Halleck Street DeMotte, IN 46310
(map)


219-987-4438   


				BBB Accredited since
								2001
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote


More















BBB








 





					Financial Engines, LLC


5025 E 82nd Street #1400 Indianapolis, IN 46250
(map)


317-579-0700   


				BBB Accredited since
								2002
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Garman Investment Group, LLC


3815 River Crossing Parkway #100 Indianapolis, IN 46240
(map)


317-566-2122   


				BBB Accredited since
								2004
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Harbour Wealth Partners, Inc.


9850 Westpoint Drive, #300 Indianapolis, IN 46256
(map)


317-579-4844   


				BBB Accredited since
								2004
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Harris & Associates LLC


6201 N Park Avenue Indianapolis, IN 46220
(map)


317-257-1120   


				BBB Accredited since
								1994
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Planned Investment Company, Inc.


9265 Counselors Row #150 Indianapolis, IN 46240
(map)


317-575-8804   


				BBB Accredited since
								1965
				
			





BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote









BBB








 





					Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC


8801 River Crossing Boulevard #100 Indianapolis, IN 46240
(map)


317-705-5700   


				BBB Accredited since
								2003
				
			



Find us on:









BBB Business Profile



        Request a Quote











Coupon
ShowVendorContent









View Larger Map

























Filter by Business Name





X





















×













×













×













×











×
Request a Quote







email


















BBB Business Profile | Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC | Accreditation



















Home
 > 
Accredited Business Directory
 > 
Investment Advisory Service
 > 
Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC














BBB Accredited Business Profile






Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC



Request a Quote

































Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC






            Business Information
        






(317) 705-5700

Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC
15 years in business

        8801 River Crossing Boulevard #100
        Indianapolis, IN 46240-2295
    




                 WEBSITE
            





                    Additional Phone Numbers
                


                            (866) 575-5700
                        





See Less Contact Options
See More Contact Options





Find a Location






                BBB File Opened: 08/07/2007
            

                Business Started: 11/01/2001


                Business Incorporated: 07/20/2001 in IN





            Type of Entity
             
            Limited Liability Company       
    



            Business Management
        


                    Mr. David Gilreath, Managing Director
                

                    Mr. Ron Brock, Managing Director
                






            Business Category
        


                Investment Advisory Service
            








 







BBB Accreditation





                BBB Accredited Since 12/20/2003
            

                BBB has determined that Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC meets Standards of BBB Accreditation, which include a commitment to make a good faith effort to resolve any consumer complaints. BBB Accredited Businesses pay a fee for accreditation review/monitoring and for support of BBB services to the public.
            

                BBB accreditation does not mean that the business's products or services have been evaluated or endorsed by BBB, or that BBB has made a determination as to the business's product quality or competency in performing services.
            








Standards of BBB Accreditation






Build Trust









            Establish and maintain a positive track record in the marketplace.
        

           An accredited business or organization agrees to:

                   1. Have been operational (actively selling products or services) in any BBB service area for at least the most recent 6 months, unless the principle(s) previously operated a similar business with an eligible record (one that qualifies for BBB accreditation).
                

                   1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached.
                

                   3. Be free from government action that demonstrates a significant failure to support BBB ethical principles in marketplace transactions (this requires a determination by BBB as to the nature of any violation, whether it was caused or condoned by management, and actions taken to resolve underlying issues that led to the government action).
                
4. Be free of an unsatisfactory rating and maintain at least a B rating at the accrediting BBB and the BBB where it is headquartered, if different.

                   5. In its relationship with BBB: 
1. meet all applicable standards within this Code of Business Practices

                            2. cooperate with BBB's activities and efforts to promote voluntary self- regulation within the business' industry
                        
3. honor any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process

                            4. complete the required application and pay all monetary obligations to BBB in a timely manner
                        









Advertise Honestly









            Adhere to established standards of advertising and selling.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Follow federal, state/provincial and local advertising laws.
                

                    2. Abide by the BBB Code of Advertising. Supply, upon request, substantiation for advertising and selling claims. Correct advertising and selling practices, when recommended by BBB.
                
3. Adhere to applicable BBB industry codes of advertising.
4. Cooperate with BBB self-regulatory programs for the resolution of advertising disputes.
5. Use the BBB name and logos in accordance with BBB policy.

                    6. Avoid misleading customers by creating the false impression of sponsorship, endorsement, popularity, trustworthiness, product quality or business size through the misuse of logos, trustmarks, pictures, testimonials, or other means
                







Tell the Truth









            Honestly represent products and services, including clear and adequate disclosures of all material terms.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Make known all material facts in both written and verbal representations, remembering that misrepresentation may result not only from direct statements but by omitting or obscuring relevant facts.
                

                    2. Ensure that any written materials are readily available, clear, accurate and complete.
                







Be Transparent









            Openly identify the nature, location, and ownership of the business, and clearly disclose all policies, guarantees and procedures that bear on a customer's decision to buy.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Upon request, provide BBB with all information required to evaluate compliance with BBB standards. This may include, but is not limited to business name, address and contact information; names and background of principles; business and banking references; licensing and/or professional accreditation; and a complete description of the nature of the business.
                

                    2. Clearly disclose to customers:

                    
1. direct and effective means to contact the business
2. terms of any written contract
3. any guarantees or warranties accompanying a product

                            4. any restrictions or limitations imposed (e.g. limited supply,maximum number available per customer)
                        
5. the business' return/refund policy

                            6. any recurring commitment into which the customer may be entering, including information on how future billing will occur
                        
7. total cost of the transaction, including tax, shipping and handling, and other related charges



                    3. If selling products or providing services on Web sites or via other electronic means: 
1. provide any required product labeling information

                            2. disclose the nature and terms of shipping, including any known delays or shortages of stock
                        
3. provide an opportunity to review and confirm the transaction before the sale is completed

                            4. provide a receipt summarizing the transaction after the purchase
                        









Honor Promises









            Abide by all written agreements and verbal representations.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 
1. Fulfill contracts signed and agreements reached. 2. Honor representations by correcting mistakes as quickly as possible.







Be Responsive









            Address marketplace disputes quickly, professionally, and in good faith.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Promptly respond to all complaints forwarded by BBB by: 
1. Resolving the complaint directly with the complainant and notifying BBB, or

                            2. Providing BBB with a response that BBB determines: 

                                    1. is professional,
                                
2. addresses all of the issues raised by the complainant,
3. includes appropriate evidence and documents supporting the business' position, and

                                    4. explains why any relief sought by the complainant cannot or should not be granted.
                                





                    2. Make a good faith effort to resolve disputes, which includes mediation if requested by BBB. Other dispute resolution options, including arbitration, may be recommended by BBB when other efforts to resolve a dispute have failed. BBB may consider a business' willingness to participate in recommended dispute resolution options in determining compliance with these standards.
                

                    3. Comply with any settlements, agreements or decisions reached as an outcome of a BBB dispute resolution process.
                

                    4. Cooperate with BBB in efforts to eliminate the underlying cause of patterns of customer complaints that are identified by BBB.
                







Safeguard Privacy









            Protect any data collected against mishandling and fraud, collect personal information only as needed, and respect the preferences of customers regarding the use of their information.
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to: 

                    1. Respect Privacy Businesses conducting e-commerce agree to disclose on their Web site the following: 
1. what information they collect,
2. with whom it is shared,
3. how it can be corrected,
4. how it is secured,

                            5. how policy changes will be communicated, and;
                        
6. how to address concerns over misuse of personal data.



                    2. Secure Sensitive Data Businesses that collect sensitive data online (credit card, bank account numbers, Social Security number, salary or other personal financial information, medical history or records, etc.) will ensure that it is transmitted via secure means.Businesses will make best efforts to comply with industry standards for the protection and proper disposal of all sensitive data, both online and offline.
                    
                

                    3. Honor Customer Preferences

                     Businesses agree to respect customer preferences regarding contact by telephone, fax and e-mail, and agree to remedy the underlying cause of any failure to do so.
                







Embody Integrity









            Approach all business dealings, marketplace transactions and commitments with integrity.
            
        

            An accredited business or organization agrees to:
            
1. Avoid involvement, by the business or its principles, in activities that reflect unfavorably on, or otherwise adversely affect the public image of BBB or its accredited businesses.












BBB Accreditation Reviews

BBB routinely monitors its files on all Accredited Businesses to affirm that they continue to meet all BBB Accreditation Standards











BBB Accreditation Process


        Not every business is eligible for BBB Accreditation. Businesses must meet, commit to and maintain the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards) 
        in order to be eligible for and maintain BBB Accreditation. The BBB Code of Business Practices represents sound advertising, selling and customer
        service practices that enhance customer trust and confidence in business. The Code is built on the BBB Standards for Trust, eight principles that
        summarize important elements of creating and maintaining trust in business.
    

        In order to be eligible for Accreditation a business must complete an Accreditation application.        
    

        Upon receipt of a fully completed BBB Application for Accreditation, BBB staff:        
        
Reviews the application
Researches the business
Verifies the information presented in the application 
May request additional information
May request proof of specific information on the application

        After the review and verification process, BBB will then evaluate if the business meets the
        BBB Code of Business Practices (Accreditation Standards)..
    
    
        Once BBB has finished its evaluation, the application for BBB Accreditation is either approved or denied. If the applicant is found in compliance with the BBB Code of Business Practices it will be presented to the BBB Board of Directors, or a committee of that board, for final approval. If the application is denied, BBB will contact the applicant, indicating the BBB Standard(s) that were not met and any recourse available to the applicant.        
    
















Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC






            BBB Rating Scorecard
        












 




                Sheaff Brock Investment Advisors, LLC
            
BBB ACCREDITATION SINCE 12/20/2003










A+




BBB Rating System Overview














Customer Review Rating:









                        The BBB Customer Review Rating represents the customer's opinion of the business.
                        The Customer Review Rating percentages are based on the total number of positive,
                        neutral, and negative reviews posted.
                    


                        There are NO reviews for this business.Be the first to leave a review!
                    



                        This business has no complaints filed
                    












        Request a Quote
    






Share your experience


              Submit a Review
          

            Submit a Complaint
        











Share




Print









































































×
Claim Your Business


                By claiming your Business Profile, businesses can add custom text or descriptive information about their services, insert company logos, and add photographs for consumers to view.
            

Close










×
AccreditedQuestionModal title


                content
            

Close










×
Customer Rating Modal title


                content
            

Close










×
Score Modal title


                content
            

Close











×
Find a Location







Filter







Close




 























 










	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































